Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2504
Resident creditor notice.

Payment or delivery under section 30-2503 may not be made if a resident creditor of the nonresident decedent has notified the debtor of the nonresident decedent or the person having possession of the personal property belonging to the nonresident decedent that the debt should not be paid nor the property delivered to the domiciliary foreign personal representative.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 210, UPC § 4-203.